Rhode Island, session 2025, SB739.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-1-51 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-1 entitled "Causes of
Action" is hereby amended to read as follows:
9-1-51. Limitation on actions based on sexual abuse or exploitation of a child.
(a)(1) All claims or causes of action brought against a perpetrator defendant by any person
for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a result of sexual abuse shall be commenced within
the later to expire of:
(i) Thirty-five (35) years of the act alleged to have caused the injury or condition; or
(ii) Seven (7) years from the time the victim discovered or reasonably should have
discovered that the injury or condition was caused by the act.
Provided, however, that the time limit or commencement of such an action under this
section shall be tolled for a child until the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age. For the purposes
of this section, “sexual abuse” shall have the same meaning as in subsection (e) of this section.
(2) All claims or causes of action brought against a non-perpetrator defendant by any
person alleging negligent supervision of a person that sexually abused a minor, or that the non-
perpetrator defendant’s conduct caused or contributed to the childhood sexual abuse by another
person to include, but not be limited to, wrongful conduct, neglect or default in supervision, hiring,
employment, training, monitoring, or failure to report and/or the concealment of sexual abuse of a
child shall be commenced within the later to expire of:

(i) Thirty-five (35) years of the act or acts alleged to have caused an injury or condition to
the minor; or
(ii) Seven (7) years from the time the victim discovered or reasonably should have
discovered that the injury or condition was caused by the act.
Provided, however, that the time limit or commencement of such an action under this
section shall be tolled for a child until the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age.
For purposes of this section “sexual abuse” shall have the same meaning as in subsection
(e) of this section.
(3) As to a perpetrator defendant, any claim or cause of action based on conduct of sexual
abuse may be commenced within the time period enumerated in subsections (a)(1)(i) and (a)(1)(ii)
regardless if the claim was time-barred under previous version of the general laws.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (a)(3) herein, any claim or cause of action based on
conduct of sexual abuse or conduct that caused or contributed to sexual abuse, if the action is not
otherwise time-barred under previous version of the general laws on the effective date of this
section, may be commenced within the time period enumerated in subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) of
this section.
(a)(1) All claims or causes of action brought against any party by any person for recovery
of damages for injury suffered as a result of sexual abuse shall not be subject to any statute of
limitations regardless of whether the claim may have lapsed or was time-barred under previous
versions of the general laws.
(2) Claims and causes of action brought against any party including, but not limited to,
sexual abuse of a minor, negligent supervision of a person who sexually abuses a minor, defendant's
conduct caused or contributed to the childhood sexual abuse of another, wrongful conduct,
negligent or default in supervision, hiring, employment, training, monitoring, or failure to report
and/or concealment of sexual abuse of a minor. All such claims or causes of action shall not be
subject to any statute of limitations regardless of whether the claim may have lapsed or was time-
barred under previous versions of the general laws.
(b) The victim need not establish which act in a series of continuing sexual abuse or
exploitation incidents caused the injury complained of, but may compute the date of discovery from
the date of the last act by the same perpetrator which is part of a common scheme or plan of sexual
abuse or exploitation.
(c) The knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall not be imputed to a person under
the age of eighteen (18) years.
(d) For purposes of this section, “child” means a person under the age of eighteen (18)
LC002015 - Page 2 of 4

years.
(e) As used in this section, “sexual abuse” means any act committed by the defendant
against a complainant who was less than eighteen (18) years of age at the time of the act and which
act would have been a criminal violation of chapter 37 of title 11.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002015
========
LC002015 - Page 3 of 4